Tennessee, session 114, HB2562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-233, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d) In establishing continuing medical education requirements pursuant to
subsection (b), the board shall require that a minimum of one (1) of the required hours
be completed on topics related to nutrition.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-9-107(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) In establishing continuing osteopathic medical education requirements
pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), the board shall require that a minimum of one (1) of the
required hours be completed on topics related to nutrition.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of promulgating rules, including emergency rules, this act
takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act
takes effect on January 1, 2028, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2562
011247
- 1 -